Hawaii, session 2026, GM1138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that enabling the
department of transportation to assume certain federal '
environmental review responsibilities under the National
Environmental Policy Act of 1969 for highway projects, as well
as railroad, public transportation, or multimodal projects
within the State, will streamline project delivery while
maintaining environmental protections.
The purpose of this Act is to;
(1) Authorize the department of transportation to
participate in the National Environmental Policy Act
Assignment Program under title 23 United States Code
sections 326 and 327; and
(2) Provide a limited waiver of sovereign immunity to
comply with federal requirements for participation in
the program.
SECTION 2. Section 26-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx
■iiiiiiiiiiHiiiiiiiiHiiiniii

S.B. NO. S?*
C.D. 1
"§26-19 Department of transportation. (a) The department
of transportation shall be headed by a single executive to be
known as the director of transportation. The department shall
establish, maintain, and operate transportation facilities of
the State, including highways, airports, harbors, and any other
transportation facilities and activities as may be authorized by
law.
(b) The department shall plan, develop, promote, and
coordinate various transportation systems management programs
that shall include but not be limited to alternate work and
school hours programs, bicycling programs, and ridesharing
programs.
(c) The department shall develop and promote ridesharing
programs that shall include but not be limited to carpool and
vanpool programs, and may assist organizations interested in
promoting similar programs, arrange for contracts with private
organizations to manage and operate these programs, and assist
in the formulation of ridesharing arrangements. Ridesharing
programs include informal arrangements in which two or more
persons ride together in a motor vehicle.
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx 2
iiiiiiiiiiaiiiiiiiiiiimaii

Page 3 S.B. NO.
"“2
' ■ h.D. 2
C.D. 1
(d) The functions and authority heretofore exercised by
the department of public works with respect to highways are
transferred to the department of transportation established by
this chapter.
(e) On July 1, 1961, the Hawaii aeronautics commission,
the board of harbor commissioners2_ and the highway commission
shall be abolished and their remaining functions, duties, and
powers shall be transferred to the department of transportation.
(f) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
department of transportation may:
(1) Acquire, or contract to acquire, by grant or purchase
any real, personal, or mixed property or any interest
therein for immediate or future use for the purposes
P
of:
(A) Climate mitigation and adaptation;
(B) Noise and visual buffer zones and barriers;
(C) Transportation projects pursuant to section
264-142;
(D) This section; or
(E) Title 15;
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx 3
■iiiiiiiniiiiiiHiiiiiilii

Page 4 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D.2
C.D. 1
(2) Own, hold, improve, and rehabilitate any real,
personal, or mixed property acquired pursuant to this
subsection; and
(3) Sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease or
otherwise dispose of, or encumber any real, personal,
or mixed property acquired pursuant to this
subsection. Upon making a finding that it is
necessary to acquire any real property for immediate
or future use for the purposes of this section or
title 15, the department of transportation may acquire
the property by condemnation pursuant to chapter 101;
provided that the property shall not thereafter be
acquired for any other public use without the consent
of the department of transportation;
provided that for the purposes of this subsection, the director
of transportation shall be authorized to exercise all the powers
vested in the board of land and natural resources for functions
subject to chapter 171; provided further that if state lands,
other than public lands, under the control and management of
another department or agency are required by the department of
transportation for the purposes of this section or title 15, the
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
department or agency having control and management of the
required lands shall, upon a request by the department of
transportation and with the approval of the governor, transfer
title to or lease those lands to the department of
transportation under terms and conditions as may be agreed to by
the parties.
(g) The department of transportation may assume
responsibilities of the United States Department of
Transportation with respect to duties under the National
Environmental Policy Act of 1969, Public Law 91-190, and with
respect to duties under other federal environmental laws as they
apply to designated transportation projects. The department of
transportation may:
(1) Assume responsibilities under title 23 United States
Code sections 326 and 327;
(2) Enter into one or more agreements, including memoranda
of understanding, with the United States Secretary of
Transportation related to:
(A) The designation of categorical exclusions from
federally required environmental assessments or
impact statements for transportation projects as
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx 5
Miniiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiii

Page 6 S.B. NO.
SK2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
provided by title 23 United States Code section
326; or
(B) The federal surface transportation project
delivery program for the delivery of
transportation projects, including highway,
railroad, public transportation, and multimodal
projects as provided by title 23 United States
Code section 327; and
(3) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this
subsection and adopt relevant federal environmental
standards as the standards for the State for a program
described in this subsection.
(h) Except as provided by this subsection, sovereign
immunity to suit in federal court and from liability shall be
waived and abolished with regard to the compliance, discharge,
or enforcement of a responsibility assumed by the department of
transportation under subsection (g). The waiver under this
subsection shall not create liability for the department of
transportation that exceeds the liability created under title 23
United States Code section 326 or 327 and shall only be valid
ifL
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx 6
iiiiiiiiiiniiiiiHiDiiiiuin

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) The department of transportation executes a memorandum
of understanding with the United States Department of
Transportation accepting the jurisdiction of the
federal courts, as required by title 23 United States
Code sections 326(c) and 327(c);
(2) The act or omission that is the subject of the lawsuit
arises out of compliance with, discharge of, or
enforcement of responsibilities assumed by the
department of transportation pursuant to title 23
United States Code sections 326 and 327; and
(3) The memorandum of understanding is in effect when the
act or omission that is the subject of the federal
lawsuit occurred."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall talce effect upon its approval.
2026-2399 SB3154 CDl SMA.docx 7
liiliiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiininiiB

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 3154, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
23-26

SB No. 3154, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives